Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1546.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 9, chapter 4, article 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 9-500.54, to read: START_STATUTE9-500.54. Municipalities; religious institutions; charitable organizations; charitable foods, goods or services; permits; rezoning; prohibitions; definitions A. NOtwithstanding any other law, a municipality may not enact any law, ordinance or OTHER regulation that requires a religious institution or charitable organization to rezone property that is owned by THE religious institution or charitable organization or obtain any type of permit for the religious institution or charitable organization to distribute charitable foods, goods or services on the property that is owned by the religious institution or charitable organization. B. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Charitable foods, goods or services" means food, goods or services that are distributed free to members of the public. 2. "Charitable organization" means a charitable organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code. 3. "Religious institution" means an institution that is owned, controlled, operated and maintained by a church, religious denomination or religious organization that is lawfully operating as a nonprofit religious corporation. END_STATUTE